basic-cs.aff
FLAG long
SFX A1   oci         ůžeme      oc[it]
SFX A1   oci         ůžete      oc[it]
SFX A1   ci          hou        oc[it]
SFX A1   oci         ůžou       oc[it]
SFX A1   ci          hl         oc[it]
SFX A1   ci          hla        oc[it]
SFX A1   ci          hlo        oc[it]
SFX A1   ci          hli        oc[it]
SFX A1   ci          hly        oc[it]
SFX A1   ci          ha         oc[it]
SFX A1   ci          houc       oc[it]
SFX A1   ci          houce      oc[it]
SFX A1   ovat        uji        ovat
SFX A1   ovat        uješ       ovat
SFX A1   ovat        uje        ovat
SFX A1   ovat        ujeme      ovat
SFX A1   ovat        ujete      ovat
SFX A1   ovat        ují        ovat
SFX A1   ovat        uj         ovat
SFX A1   ovat        ujte       ovat
SFX A1   ovat        ujme       ovat
SFX A1   ovat        ujíc       ovat
SFX A1   ovat        ujíce      ovat
SFX A1   at          u          [^o]vat
SFX A1   at          eš         [^o]vat
SFX A1   at          e          [^o]vat
SFX A1   at          eme        [^o]vat
SFX A1   at          ete        [^o]vat
SFX A1   at          ou         [^o]vat
SFX A1   at          0          avat
SFX A1   at          me         avat
SFX A1   at          te         avat
SFX A1   t           je         avat
SFX A1   t           jíc        avat
SFX A1   t           jíce       avat
SFX A1   at          i          [^aio]vat
SFX A1   at          ěme        [^aio]vat
SFX A1   at          ěte        [^aio]vat
SFX A1   zat         žu         zat
SFX A1   zat         žeš        zat
SFX A1   zat         že         zat
SFX A1   zat         žeme       zat
SFX A1   zat         žete       zat
SFX A1   zat         žou        zat
SFX A1   zat         ž          [^áíu]zat
SFX A1   zat         žme        [^áíu]zat
SFX A1   zat         žte        [^áíu]zat
SFX A1   ázat        až         ázat
SFX A1   ázat        ažme       ázat
SFX A1   ázat        ažte       ázat
SFX A1   ízat        iž         ízat
SFX A1   ízat        ižme       ízat
SFX A1   ízat        ižte       ízat
SFX A1   at          ej         uzat
SFX A1   at          ejme       uzat
SFX A1   at          ejte       uzat
SFX A1   zat         žíc        [^áíu]zat
SFX A1   zat         žíce       [^áíu]zat
SFX A1   t           je         [yu]zat
SFX A1   t           jíc        [yu]zat
SFX A1   t           jíce       [yu]zat
SFX A1   sat         šu         sat
SFX A1   sat         šeš        sat
SFX A1   sat         še         sat
SFX A1   sat         šeme       sat
SFX A1   sat         šete       sat
SFX A1   sat         šou        sat
SFX A1   sat         š          sat
SFX A1   sat         šme        sat
SFX A1   sat         šte        sat
SFX A1   sat         šíc        sat
SFX A1   sat         šíce       sat
SFX A1   rat         eru        rat
SFX A1   rat         ereš       rat
SFX A1   rat         ere        rat
SFX A1   rat         ereme      rat
SFX A1   rat         erete      rat
SFX A1   rat         erou       rat
SFX A1   rat         er         rat
SFX A1   rat         erme       rat
SFX A1   rat         erte       rat
SFX A1   rat         era        rat
SFX A1   rat         erouc      rat
SFX A1   rat         erouce     rat
SFX A1   akat        áču        akat
SFX A1   akat        áčeš       akat
SFX A1   akat        áče        akat
SFX A1   akat        áčeme      akat
SFX A1   akat        áčete      akat
SFX A1   akat        áčou       akat
SFX A1   akat        ač         akat
SFX A1   akat        ačme       akat
SFX A1   akat        ačte       akat
SFX A1   akat        ačíc       akat
SFX A1   akat        ačíce      akat
SFX A1   kat         ču         [^a]kat
SFX A1   kat         češ        [^a]kat
SFX A1   kat         če         [^a]kat
SFX A1   kat         čeme       [^a]kat
SFX A1   kat         čete       [^a]kat
SFX A1   kat         čou        [^a]kat
SFX A1   at          ej         kat
SFX A1   at          ejme       kat
SFX A1   at          ejte       kat
SFX A1   at          u          [^krsvz]at
SFX A1   at          eš         [^krsvz]at
SFX A1   at          e          [^krsvz]at
SFX A1   at          eme        [^krsvz]at
SFX A1   at          ete        [^krsvz]at
SFX A1   at          ou         [^krsvz]at
SFX A1   at          0          [aeiyě][^krsvz]at
SFX A1   at          me         [aeiyě][^krsvz]at
SFX A1   at          te         [aeiyě][^krsvz]at
SFX A1   at          0          [^o]u[^rsvz]at
SFX A1   at          me         [^o]u[^rsvz]at
SFX A1   at          te         [^o]u[^rsvz]at
SFX A1   t           je         [^rvz]at
SFX A1   t           jíc        [^rvz]at
SFX A1   t           jíce       [^rvz]at
SFX A1   at          i          [csz][bmp]at
SFX A1   at          ěme        [csz][bmp]at
SFX A1   at          ěte        [csz][bmp]at
SFX A1   t           ň          stat
SFX A1   t           ňme        stat
SFX A1   t           ňte        stat
SFX A1   at          ej         [^csz][bmp]at
SFX A1   at          ejme       [^csz][bmp]at
SFX A1   at          ejte       [^csz][bmp]at
SFX A1   at          ej         [^rsvzbmpt]at
SFX A1   at          ejme       [^rsvzbmpt]at
SFX A1   at          ejte       [^rsvzbmpt]at
SFX A1   at          i          šlat
SFX A1   t           l          [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A1   t           la         [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A1   t           lo         [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A1   t           li         [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A1   t           ly         [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A1   it          ím         it
SFX A1   it          íš         it
SFX A1   it          í          it
SFX A1   it          íme        it
SFX A1   it          íte        it
SFX A1   it          ě          [dtnbfpmv]it
SFX A1   it          e          [^dtnbfpmv]it
SFX A1   it          íc         it
SFX A1   it          íce        it
SFX A1   it          0          [^o]učit
SFX A1   it          me         [^o]učit
SFX A1   it          te         [^o]učit
SFX A1   oubit       ub         oubit
SFX A1   oubit       ubme       oubit
SFX A1   oubit       ubte       oubit
SFX A1   oučit       uč         oučit
SFX A1   oučit       učme       oučit
SFX A1   oučit       učte       oučit
SFX A1   dit         ď          [^o]udit
SFX A1   dit         ďme        [^o]udit
SFX A1   dit         ďte        [^o]udit
SFX A1   oudit       uď         oudit
SFX A1   oudit       uďme       oudit
SFX A1   oudit       uďte       oudit
SFX A1   t           0          [lr]oudit
SFX A1   it          ěme        [lr]oudit
SFX A1   it          ěte        [lr]oudit
SFX A1   oulit       ul         oulit
SFX A1   oulit       ulme       oulit
SFX A1   oulit       ulte       oulit
SFX A1   ounit       ouni       ounit
SFX A1   ounit       ouněme     ounit
SFX A1   ounit       ouněte     ounit
SFX A1   oupit       up         oupit
SFX A1   oupit       upme       oupit
SFX A1   oupit       upte       oupit
SFX A1   ouřit       uř         ouřit
SFX A1   ouřit       uřme       ouřit
SFX A1   ouřit       uřte       ouřit
SFX A1   ousit       us         ousit
SFX A1   ousit       usme       ousit
SFX A1   ousit       uste       ousit
SFX A1   outit       uť         outit
SFX A1   outit       uťme       outit
SFX A1   outit       uťte       outit
SFX A1   oužit       už         oužit
SFX A1   oužit       užme       oužit
SFX A1   oužit       užte       oužit
SFX A1   t           0          soužit
SFX A1   it          eme        soužit
SFX A1   it          ete        soužit
SFX A1   ůlit        ul         ůlit
SFX A1   ůlit        ulme       ůlit
SFX A1   ůlit        ulte       ůlit
SFX A1   úžit        už         úžit
SFX A1   úžit        užme       úžit
SFX A1   úžit        užte       úžit
SFX A1   it          0          [aeioyě][bcčfjlmpřsšvzž]it
SFX A1   it          me         [aeioyě][bcčfjlmpřsšvzž]it
SFX A1   it          te         [aeioyě][bcčfjlmpřsšvzž]it
SFX A1   t           0          [^aeiouyáéíóúůýěr][cčjlřsšzž]it
SFX A1   it          eme        [^aeiouyáéíóúůýěr][cčjlřsšzž]it
SFX A1   it          ete        [^aeiouyáéíóúůýěr][cčjlřsšzž]it
