basic-cs.dic
agitovat/A1T1N1
akumulovat/A1T1N1
apelovat/A1T1N1
aspirovat/A1T1N1
barvit/A1T1N1
blednout/A1N1
bodnout/A1T1N1
bouřit/A1T1N1
brousit/A1C1N1
budovat/A1T1N1
bílit/A1T1N1
chcípnout/A1N1
chrastit/A1N1
chytnout/A1T1N1
cvaknout/A1T1N1
debutovat/A1N1
dekorovat/A1T1N1
deportovat/A1T1N1
diagnostikovat/A1T1N1
diskvalifikovat/A1T1N1
dodržet/A1T1N1
dolaďovat/A1T1N1
doplatit/A1C1N1
dorozumět/A1J1N1
dosvědčit/A1T1N1
dovtípit/A1T1N1
drolit/A1T1N1
dělit/A1T1N1
expedovat/A1T1N1
fixovat/A1T1N1
gratulovat/A1T1N1
hlavičkovat/A1T1N1
honosit/A1N1
hrnout/A1T1N1
idealizovat/A1T1N1
inovovat/A1T1N1
ječet/A1T1N1
kašlat/A1N1
klouzat/A1J1N1
komplikovat/A1T1N1
kontaminovat/A1T1N1
korunovat/A1T1N1
kritizovat/A1T1N1
kupit/A1T1N1
kňučet/A1N1
lehnout/A1N1
listovat/A1T1N1
láteřit/A1T1N1
mazat/A1T1N1
modernizovat/A1T1N1
muknout/A1N1
nabalit/A1T1N1
nadělit/A1T1N1
najezdit/A1T1N1
naleznout/A1N1
naočkovat/A1T1N1
napustit/A1C1N1
nashromáždit/A1T1N1
nastudovat/A1T1N1
natropit/A1T1N1
navyknout/A1T1N1
nařknout/A1C1T1N1
notovat/A1T1N1
obdržet/A1T1N1
obložit/A1T1N1
obrodit/A1C1N1
obydlet/A1T1N1
ochromovat/A1T1N1
odchytit/A1C1N1
odhadnout/A1T1N1
odkázat/A1T1N1
odnaučit/A1T1N1
odrazit/A1C1X1N1
odstrkovat/A1T1N1
odvažovat/A1T1N1
odzvonit/A1T1N1
ohrnovat/A1T1N1
okusit/A1N1
opakovat/A1T1N1
opominout/A1T1N1
opěvovat/A1T1N1
osladit/A1C1N1
ospravedlňovat/A1T1N1
otestovat/A1T1N1
ověnčit/A1T1N1
očkovat/A1T1N1
paralyzovat/A1T1N1
pilovat/A1T1N1
plácnout/A1T1N1
pochybit/A1T1N1
podlehnout/A1N1
podražit/A1T1N1
podřídit/A1C1N1
pohroužit/A1T1N1
pokropit/A1T1N1
polepit/A1T1N1
pomoci/A1N1
popichovat/A1T1N1
porodit/A1C1N1
poskvrnit/A1T1N1
postrčit/A1T1N1
potvrdit/A1C1N1
povraždit/A1T1N1
pozastavovat/A1T1N1
poškodit/A1C1N1
prchnout/A1T1N1
prodchnout/A1T1N1
prohodit/A1C1N1
prolomit/A1T1N1
propadnout/A1N1
prosakovat/A1T1N1
protahovat/A1T1N1
prozrazovat/A1T1N1
pulsovat/A1N1
přeběhnout/A1T1N1
předstoupit/A1T1X1N1
překazit/A1C1N1
přelétnout/A1N1
přepočíst/A1T1N1
přeslechnout/A1T1N1
přetavit/A1T1N1
převrhnout/A1C1N1
přiblížit/A1T1N1
přiklepnout/A1T1N1
přimáčknout/A1T1N1
připočíst/A1T1N1
přisunout/A1T1N1
přivábit/A1T1N1
přiškrtit/A1C1N1
ratifikovat/A1T1N1
rekapitulovat/A1T1N1
restituovat/A1T1N1
rozbalit/A1T1N1
rozetřít/A1T1N1
rozjasnit/A1T1N1
rozloučit/A1T1N1
rozmělňovat/A1T1N1
rozpřáhnout/A1C1N1
roztříštit/A1T1N1
rozčilit/A1T1N1
rámovat/A1T1N1
scvrknout/A1T1N1
seskočit/A1N1
seřídit/A1C1N1
simulovat/A1T1N1
skoupit/A1T1N1
sloučit/A1T1N1
smluvit/A1T1N1
snížit/A1T1N1
spatřit/A1T1N1
spokojit/A1T1N1
sprchovat/A1T1N1
stavit/A1T1N1
stranit/A1N1
stvrzovat/A1T1N1
sunout/A1T1N1
svážet/A1J1T1N1
sídlit/A1N1
tisknout/A1C1T1N1
tratit/A1C1N1
trčet/A1N1
tíhnout/A1T1N1
ubránit/A1T1N1
udobřit/A1T1N1
ujasnit/A1T1N1
ukrojit/A1T1N1
umisťovat/A1T1N1
unavit/A1T1N1
upozorňovat/A1T1N1
urážet/A1J1T1N1
usmířit/A1T1N1
ustrojit/A1T1N1
utopit/A1T1N1
uvařit/A1T1N1
uzamknout/A1C1T1N1
uštědřit/A1T1N1
ventilovat/A1T1N1
vlastnit/A1T1N1
vnutit/A1C1N1
vrážet/A1J1T1N1
vtrhnout/A1N1
vyburcovat/A1T1N1
vydražit/A1T1N1
vyhlásit/A1C1N1
vyhrocovat/A1T1N1
vykašlat/A1T1N1
vykračovat/A1T1N1
vylepit/A1T1N1
vylámat/A1T1N1
vymstít/A1T1N1
vyniknout/A1N1
vyplašit/A1T1N1
vyprofilovat/A1T1N1
vypůjčovat/A1T1N1
vysledovat/A1T1N1
vystoupit/A1T1X1N1
vysvobodit/A1C1N1
vytrhnout/A1C1N1
vytřeštit/A1T1N1
vyvázat/A1T1N1
vyzvat/A1T1N1
vyřádit/A1T1N1
vzbouřit/A1T1N1
vznítit/A1C1N1
vézt/A1T1N1
vštípit/A1T1N1
zabořit/A1T1N1
zachránit/A1T1N1
zahalovat/A1T1N1
zahynout/A1N1
zakončit/A1T1N1
zakřiknout/A1T1N1
zamhouřit/A1T1N1
zamítnout/A1T1N1
zapečetit/A1T1N1
započíst/A1T1N1
zaregistrovat/A1T1N1
zasluhovat/A1T1N1
zastřešit/A1T1N1
zatemnit/A1T1N1
zatížit/A1T1N1
zavrtět/A1T1N1
začistit/A1C1N1
zbankrotovat/A1N1
zdaňovat/A1T1N1
zdržet/A1T1N1
zesměšňovat/A1T1N1
zhoršovat/A1T1N1
zjemnit/A1T1N1
zkomponovat/A1T1N1
zkrášlit/A1T1N1
zmapovat/A1T1N1
zmáčknout/A1T1N1
znemožnit/A1T1N1
zneškodnit/A1T1N1
zohledňovat/A1T1N1
zplodit/A1C1N1
zprovoznit/A1T1N1
zranit/A1T1N1
zrychlit/A1T1N1
ztvárňovat/A1T1N1
zveřejňovat/A1T1N1
zvýhodňovat/A1T1N1
záviset/A1J1N1
ústit/A1N1
členit/A1T1N1
šeptnout/A1T1N1
šlehnout/A1T1N1
šílet/A1J1N1
řádit/A1N1
